Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202630-2628
General powers, rights, and duties of guardian; inventory.

(a) Except as limited by section 30-2620, a guardian of an incapacitated person has the same powers, rights, and duties respecting the guardian's ward that a parent has respecting the parent's unemancipated minor child, except that a guardian is not liable to third persons for acts of the ward solely by reason of the parental relationship. In particular, and without qualifying the foregoing, a guardian has the following powers and duties, except as may be specified by order of the court:

(1) To the extent that it is consistent with the terms of any order by a court of competent jurisdiction relating to detention or commitment of the ward, a guardian is entitled to custody of the person of his or her ward and may establish the ward's place of abode within this state or, with court permission, outside of this state. When establishing the ward's place of abode, a guardian shall make every reasonable effort to ensure that the placement is the least restrictive alternative. A guardian shall authorize a placement to a more restrictive environment only after careful evaluation of the need for such placement. The guardian may obtain a professional evaluation or assessment that such placement is in the best interest of the ward.

(2) If entitled to custody of his or her ward, a guardian shall make provision for the care, comfort, and maintenance of his or her ward and, whenever appropriate, arrange for the ward's training and education. Without regard to custodial rights of the ward's person, a guardian shall take reasonable care of his or her ward's clothing, furniture, vehicles, and other personal effects and commence protective proceedings if other property of his or her ward is in need of protection.

(3) A guardian may give any consents or approvals that may be necessary to enable the ward to receive medical, psychiatric, psychological, or other professional care, counsel, treatment, or service. When making such medical or psychiatric decisions, the guardian shall consider and carry out the intent of the ward expressed prior to incompetency to the extent allowable by law. Notwithstanding this provision or any other provision of the Nebraska Probate Code, the ward may authorize the release of financial, medical, and other confidential records pursuant to sections 20-161 to 20-166.

(4) If no conservator for the estate of the ward has been appointed, a guardian shall, within thirty days after appointment, prepare and file with the appointing court a complete inventory of the ward's estate together with the guardian's oath or affirmation that the inventory is complete and accurate so far as the guardian is informed. The guardian shall mail a copy thereof by first-class mail to the ward, if the ward can be located and has attained the age of fourteen years, and to all other interested persons as defined in section 30-2601. The guardian shall file with the court a certificate of mailing showing that copies were sent to all interested persons by first-class mail along with a form to send back to the court that indicates if such person wants to continue receiving notifications about the proceedings. The guardian shall keep suitable records of the guardian's administration and exhibit the same on request of any interested person. To the extent a guardian, who has not been named a conservator, has possession or control of the ward's estate, the guardian shall file with the court an updated inventory every year along with a certificate of mailing showing that copies were sent to all interested persons and, if a bond has been required, to the bonding company by first-class mail.

(5) If no conservator for the estate of the ward has been appointed, a guardian may:

(i) Institute proceedings to compel any person under a duty to support the ward or to pay sums for the welfare of the ward to perform such person's duty;

(ii) Receive money and tangible property deliverable to the ward and apply the money and property for support, care, and education of the ward; but a guardian may not use funds from his or her ward's estate for room and board which the guardian or the guardian's spouse, parent, or child has furnished the ward unless a charge for the service is approved by order of the court made upon notice to at least one of the next of kin of the ward, if notice is possible. A guardian must exercise care to conserve any excess for the ward's needs; and

(iii) Exercise a settlor's powers with respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property when authorized by a court acting under the authority of subsection (f) of section 30-3854. In acting under the authority of subsection (f) of section 30-3854, the court shall proceed in the same manner as provided under subdivision (3) of section 30-2637.

(6) A guardian is required to report the condition of his or her ward and of the estate which has been subject to the guardian's possession or control, at least every year and as required by the court or court rule. The court shall receive from any interested person, for a period of thirty days after the filing of the guardian's report, any comments with regard to the need for continued guardianship or amendment of the guardianship order. If the court has reason to believe that additional rights should be returned to the ward or assigned to the guardian, the court shall set a date for a hearing and may provide all protections as set forth for the original finding of incapacity and appointment of a guardian.

(7) If a conservator has been appointed, all of the ward's estate received by the guardian in excess of those funds expended to meet current expenses for support, care, and education of the ward must be paid to the conservator for management as provided in the Nebraska Probate Code, and the guardian must account to the conservator for funds expended.

(b) Any guardian of one for whom a conservator also has been appointed shall control the custody and care of the ward and is entitled to receive reasonable sums for the guardian's services and for room and board furnished to the ward as agreed upon between the guardian and the conservator if the amounts agreed upon are reasonable under the circumstances. The guardian may request the conservator to expend the ward's estate by payment to third persons or institutions for the ward's care and maintenance.

(c) Nothing in subdivision (a)(3) of this section or in any other part of this section shall be construed to alter the decisionmaking authority of an attorney in fact designated and authorized under sections 30-3401 to 30-3432 to make health care decisions pursuant to a power of attorney for health care.

(d) A guardian shall monitor the ward and his or her care. Monitoring shall, at a minimum, consist of quarterly personal contact with the ward. The guardian shall maintain a written record of each visit. Personal contact may be in person or virtually if such contact allows the guardian to assess the ward and his or her care. If a guardian is unable to contact a ward, the guardian shall provide the court documentation of the attempts to contact the ward made by the guardian. The requirements of this subsection may be modified or waived by the court upon a request by the guardian.

(e) A guardian shall make all reasonable efforts to provide the ward the ability to attend all hearings relating to his or her guardianship in person or virtually.

(f) A guardian shall not accept an appointment for a permanent guardianship of an individual if the guardian serves as a permanent guardian or conservator for twenty or more individuals. Temporary guardianships or conservatorships shall not count toward such limit.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 246, UPC § 5-312;

Laws 1982, LB 428, § 11;

Laws 1993, LB 782, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 466, § 11;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 130;

Laws 2011, LB157, § 39;

Laws 2013, LB172, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB985, § 4.
July 18, 2026
Placing the establishment of a visitation schedule in the guardian is anticipated by the statutory duties assigned to a guardian with full powers. In re Guardianship & Conservatorship of Karin P., 271 Neb. 917, 716 N.W.2d 681 (2006).

Pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, if a guardian has been appointed and an attorney in fact has been designated and authorized under a valid power of attorney for health care, the attorney in fact's authority to make health care decisions supersedes the guardian's authority to make such decisions. In re Guardianship & Conservatorship of Mueller, 23 Neb. App. 430, 872 N.W.2d 906 (2015).

Subsection (c) of this section does not preclude a court from considering a ward's best interests and revoking or setting aside a health care power of attorney in favor of a guardianship when the facts support such action. In re Guardianship & Conservatorship of Mueller, 23 Neb. App. 430, 872 N.W.2d 906 (2015).

In a guardianship proceeding, where no conservator for the estate of the ward had been appointed, the coguardians who had made payments to third-party retailers from the assets of the ward did not violate subdivision (a)(4)(ii) of this section by not obtaining prior judicial approval, because no such requirement exists for payments to third-party retailers. The coguardians who made unapproved payments to themselves from the assets of the ward for the ward's room and board violated subdivision (a)(4)(ii) of this section. In re Guardianship of Gaube, 14 Neb. App. 259, 707 N.W.2d 16 (2005).